Arkansas, session 2025, SB340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-222(a)(5)(A), concerning the penalty
for unexcused absences and the revocation of driving privileges, is amended
to read as follows:
(5)(A) When a student exceeds the number of unexcused absences
provided for in the district's or the Career Education and Workforce
Development Board's student attendance policy, or when a student has violated
the conditions of an agreement granting special arrangements under
subdivision (a)(4)(D) of this section, the school district or the adult
education program shall notify the prosecuting authority and the community
truancy board, if a community truancy board has been created, and the
student's parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis shall be subject to a
civil penalty through a family in need of services action in circuit court,
as authorized under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section, but not to exceed
five hundred dollars ($500) plus costs of court and any reasonable fees
*LJH139*
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
assessed by the court.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Arkansas Code Title 9, Chapter 27, is
renamed "Proceedings Involving Juveniles".

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-27-303(33), concerning the definition of
"juvenile" as applicable to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is amended to
read as follows:
(33) “Juvenile” means an individual who is:
(A) From birth to eighteen (18) years of age, whether
married or single; or
(B) Adjudicated delinquent, a juvenile member of a family
in need of services, or dependent or dependent-neglected by the juvenile
division of circuit court prior to before reaching eighteen (18) years of age
and for whom the juvenile division of circuit court retains jurisdiction; or
(C) Both of the following:
(i) Under eighteen (18) years of age; and
(ii) Under the jurisdiction of the criminal division
of a circuit court or under the jurisdiction of the juvenile division of a
circuit court under this subchapter;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 9-27-316(b), concerning the right to
counsel under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1)(A)(i) The inquiry concerning the ability of the juvenile to
retain counsel shall include a consideration of the juvenile's financial
resources and the financial resources of his or her family There is a
rebuttable presumption that a juvenile is indigent for the purpose of
appointing counsel.
(ii)(a) Except as provided by subdivision
(b)(1)(A)(ii)(b) of this section, if the court appoints counsel to represent
a juvenile, the appointment shall be made at no cost to the juvenile or the
parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile.
(b) Subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii)(a) of this
section is subject to funding and appropriation by the General Assembly.
(B) However, the The failure of the juvenile's family to
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
retain counsel for the juvenile shall not deprive the juvenile of the right
to appointed court-appointed counsel if required under this section.
(2) After review by the court of an affidavit of financial means
completed and verified by the parent of the juvenile and a determination by
the court that the parent or juvenile has the ability to pay, the The court
may shall not order financially able juveniles, parents, guardians, or
custodians a juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile to
pay all or part of reasonable the attorney's fees and expenses for
representation of a the juvenile.
(3) All moneys collected by the circuit clerk under this
subsection shall be retained by the clerk and deposited into a special fund
to be known as the “juvenile representation fund” The court shall not order a
juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile to pay a fee
related to the cost of providing the juvenile with counsel.
(4) The court may direct that money from this fund be used in
providing counsel for juveniles under this section in delinquency or family-
in-need-of-services cases and indigent parents or guardians in dependency-
neglect cases as provided by subsection (h) of this section.
(5) Any money remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal
year shall not revert to any other fund but shall carry over into the next
fiscal year in the juvenile representation fund.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 9-27-323 is amended to read as follows:
9-27-323. Diversion — Conditions — Agreement — Completion — Definition.
(a) If the prosecuting attorney, after consultation with the intake
officer, determines that a diversion of a delinquency case is in the best
interests of the juvenile and the community, the officer with the consent of
the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian may attempt to
make a satisfactory diversion of a case.
(b) If the intake officer determines that a diversion of a family in
need of services case is in the best interest of the juvenile and the
community, the officer with the consent of the petitioner, juvenile, and his
or her parent, guardian, or custodian may attempt to make a satisfactory
diversion of a case.
(c) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, a diversion of a case is subject to the following conditions:
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
(1) The juvenile has admitted his or her involvement in:
(A) A delinquent act for a delinquency diversion; or
(B) A family in need of services act for a family in need
of services diversion;
(2) The intake officer advises the juvenile and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian that they have the right to refuse a diversion
of the case and demand the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication;
(3) Any diversion agreement is entered into voluntarily and
intelligently by the juvenile with the advice of his or her attorney or by
the juvenile with the consent of a parent, guardian, or custodian if the
juvenile is not represented by counsel;
(4) The diversion agreement provides for the supervision of a
juvenile or the referral of the juvenile to a public or private agency for
services not to exceed six (6) months;
(5) All other terms of a diversion agreement do not exceed nine
(9) months; and
(6) The juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
shall have the right to terminate the diversion agreement at any time and to
request the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication.
(d)(1) The terms of the diversion agreement shall:
(A) Be in writing in simple, ordinary, and understandable
language;
(B) State that the agreement was entered into voluntarily
by the juvenile;
(C) Name the attorney or other person who advised the
juvenile upon the juvenile's entering into the agreement; and
(D) Be signed by all parties to the agreement and by the
prosecuting attorney if it is a delinquency case and the offense would
constitute a felony if committed by an adult or a family in need of services
case pursuant to § 6-18-222.
(2)(A) A Except as provided by subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this
section, at no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of
the juvenile, a copy of the diversion agreement shall be given to the
juvenile, the counsel for the juvenile, the parent, guardian, or custodian of
the juvenile, and the intake officer, who shall retain the copy of the
diversion agreement in the case file.
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
(B) Subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section is subject to
funding and appropriation by the General Assembly.
(e) Diversion agreements shall be:
(1) Implemented by all juvenile courts based on validated
assessment tools; and
(2) Used to provide for:
(A) Nonjudicial probation under the supervision of the
intake officer or probation officer for a period during which the juvenile
may be required to comply with specified conditions concerning his or her
conduct and activities;
(B) Participation in a court-approved program of
education, counseling, or treatment;
(C) Participation in a court-approved teen court;
(D) Participation in a juvenile drug court program;
(E) Enrollment in the Regional Educational Career
Alternative School System for Adjudicated Youth; and
(F)(i) Payment of restitution to the victim.
(ii) Payments of restitution under subdivision
(e)(2)(F)(i) of this section shall be paid under § 16-13-326.
(f)(1)(A) If a diversion of a complaint has been made, a petition
based upon the events out of which the original complaint arose may be filed:
(i) At no cost to the juvenile or the parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile; and
(ii) only Only during the period for which the
agreement was entered into.
(B) Subdivision (f)(1)(A)(i) of this section is subject to
funding and appropriation by the General Assembly.
(2) If a petition is filed within this period, the juvenile's
compliance with all proper and reasonable terms of the agreement shall be
grounds for dismissal of the petition by the court.
(g) The diversion agreement may be terminated, and the prosecuting
attorney in a delinquency case or the petitioner in a family in need of
services case may file a petition, at no cost to the juvenile or the parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile, if at any time during the agreement
period:
(1) The juvenile or his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
declines to further participate in the diversion process;
(2) The juvenile fails, without reasonable excuse, to attend a
scheduled conference;
(3) The juvenile appears unable or unwilling to benefit from the
diversion process; or
(4) The intake officer becomes apprised of new or additional
information that indicates that further efforts at diversion would not be in
the best interests of the juvenile or society.
(h) Upon the satisfactory completion of the diversion period:
(1) The juvenile shall be dismissed without further proceedings;
(2) The intake officer shall furnish written notice of the
dismissal to the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; and
(3)(A) The complaint and the diversion agreement, and all
references thereto to the complaint and the diversion agreement, may be
expunged by the court from the juvenile's file at no cost to the juvenile or
the parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile, except as provided by
subdivision (h)(3)(B) of this section.
(B) Subdivision (h)(3)(A) of this section is subject to
funding and appropriation by the General Assembly.
(i)(1) A juvenile intake or probation officer may charge a diversion
fee only after review of an affidavit of financial means and a determination
of the juvenile's or the juvenile's parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
ability to pay the fee juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a
juvenile shall not be charged a diversion fee.
(2) The diversion fee shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month to the juvenile division of circuit court.
(3) The court may direct that the fees be collected by the
juvenile officer, sheriff, or court clerk for the county in which the fees
are charged.
(4) The officer designated by the court to collect diversion
fees shall maintain receipts and account for all incoming fees and shall
deposit the fees at least weekly into the county treasury of the county where
the fees are collected and in which diversion services are provided.
(5) The diversion fees shall be deposited into the account with
the juvenile service fees under § 16-13-326.
(j)(1) In judicial districts having more than one (1) county, the
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
judge may designate the treasurer of one (1) of the counties in the district
as the depository of all juvenile fees collected in the district.
(2) The treasurer so designated by the court shall maintain a
separate account of the juvenile fees collected and expended in each county
in the district.
(3) Money remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall not
revert to any other fund but shall carry over to the next fiscal year.
(4) The funds derived from the collection of diversion fees
shall be used by agreement of the judge or judges of the circuit court
designated to hear juvenile cases in their district plan pursuant to Supreme
Court Administrative Order No. 14, originally issued April 6, 2001, and the
quorum court of the county to provide services and supplies to juveniles at
the discretion of the juvenile division of circuit court.
(k)(1)(j)(1) The Department of Human Services shall develop a
statewide referral protocol for helping to coordinate the delivery of
services to sexually exploited children.
(2) As used in this section, “sexually exploited child” means a
person less than eighteen (18) years of age who has been subject to sexual
exploitation because the person:
(A) Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-
103;
(B) Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. §
1591, as it existed on January 1, 2013; or
(C) Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or
sexual solicitation under § 5-70-103.
(k)(1) Except as provided by subdivision (k)(2) of this section, the
diversion of a case under this section shall be implemented and administered
at no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile.
(2) Subdivision (k)(1) of this section is subject to funding and
appropriation by the General Assembly.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 9-27-330(a), concerning juveniles found to
be delinquent, is amended to read as follows:
(a) If a juvenile is found to be delinquent, the circuit court may
enter an order making any of the following dispositions based upon the best
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
interest of the juvenile:
(1)(A) Transfer legal custody of the juvenile to any licensed
agency responsible for the care of delinquent juveniles or to a relative or
other individual.
(B)(i) Commit the juvenile to the Division of Youth
Services using the validated risk assessment system for Arkansas juvenile
offenders selected by the Juvenile Judges Committee of the Arkansas Judicial
Council with the division and distributed and administered by the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(ii)(a) The validated risk assessment system
selected by the Juvenile Judges Committee of the Arkansas Judicial Council
with the division shall be:
(1) The only validated risk assessment
used by courts for commitment;
(2) Used throughout the state; and
(3) Applied to all commitment decisions
for all juvenile offenders.
(b) The validated risk assessment may be
changed to another validated risk assessment system by the Juvenile Judges
Committee of the Arkansas Judicial Council with the division.
(iii)(a) In an order of commitment, the court
may recommend that a juvenile be placed in a treatment program or community-
based program instead of a youth services center and shall make specific
findings in support of such a placement in the order.
(b) The court shall also specify in its
recommendation whether it is requesting a division aftercare plan upon the
juvenile's release from the division.
(c) A court may not commit a juvenile to
the division if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of only a misdemeanor
offense unless the:
(1) Juvenile is determined to be
moderate risk or high risk by the validated risk assessment; and
(2) Court makes specific findings
as to the factors considered for the disposition to be in the juvenile's best
interest.
(d) A court may not commit a juvenile to
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
the division if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of only a misdemeanor
offense and the juvenile is determined to be low risk by the validated risk
assessment.
(iv) A circuit court committing a juvenile to the
division under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iii) of this section shall make written
findings and consider the following factors in making its determination to
commit the juvenile to the division:
(a) The previous history of the juvenile,
including without limitation whether:
(1) The juvenile has been adjudicated
delinquent and, if so, whether the offense was against a person or property;
and
(2) Any other previous history of
antisocial behavior or patterns of physical violence exist;
(b) Whether the circuit court has previously
offered less restrictive programs or services to the juvenile and whether
there are less restrictive programs or services available to the court that
are likely to rehabilitate the juvenile before the expiration of the court's
jurisdiction;
(c) Written reports and other materials
relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history;
and
(d) Any other factors deemed relevant by the
circuit court.
(v) Upon receipt of an order of commitment with
recommendations for placement, the division shall consider the
recommendations of the committing court in placing a juvenile in a youth
services facility or a community-based program.
(vi) Upon receipt of an order of commitment, the
division or its contracted provider or designee shall prepare a written
treatment plan that:
(a) States the treatment plan for the
juvenile, including the types of programs and services that will be provided
to the juvenile;
(b) States the anticipated length of the
juvenile's commitment;
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
(c)(1) States recommendations as to the most
appropriate post-commitment placement for the juvenile.
(2) If the juvenile cannot return to the
custody of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian because of child
maltreatment, which includes the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
refusing to take responsibility for the juvenile, the division shall
immediately contact the Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human
Services.
(3) The Office of Chief Counsel of the
Department of Human Services shall petition the committing court to determine
the issue of custody of the juvenile;
(d) States any post-commitment community-based
services that will be offered to the juvenile and to his or her family by the
division or the community-based provider;
(e)(1) Outlines an aftercare plan, if
recommended, including specific terms and conditions required of the juvenile
and the community-based provider.
(2) If the juvenile progresses in
treatment and an aftercare plan is no longer recommended or the terms of the
aftercare plan need to be amended as a result of treatment changes, any
change in the terms of the aftercare plan and conditions shall be provided in
writing and shall be explained to the juvenile.
(3) The terms and conditions shall be
provided also to the prosecuting attorney, the juvenile's attorney, and to
the juvenile's legal parent, guardian, or custodian by the division or its
designee before the juvenile's release from the division.
(4) All aftercare terms shall be
provided to the committing court; and
(f)(1) The treatment plan shall be filed with
the committing court no later than thirty (30) days from the date of the
commitment order or before the juvenile's release, whichever is sooner.
(2) A copy of the written treatment plan
shall be provided at no cost to the juvenile or the juvenile's parent,
guardian, or custodian and shall be explained to the juvenile.
(3) A copy shall be provided to the
prosecutor, the juvenile's attorney, and to the juvenile's legal parent,
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
guardian, or custodian and shall be filed in the court files of any circuit
court where a dependency-neglect or family in need of services case
concerning that juvenile is pending.
(C) This transfer of custody shall not include placement
of adjudicated delinquents into the custody of the Department of Human
Services for the purpose of foster care except as under the Child
Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.;
(2) Order the juvenile or members of the juvenile's family to
submit to physical, psychiatric, or psychological evaluations at no cost to
the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile;
(3) Grant permanent custody to an individual upon proof that the
parent or guardian from whom the juvenile has been removed has not complied
with the orders of the court and that no further services or periodic reviews
are required;
(4)(A) Place the juvenile on probation under those conditions
and limitations that the court may prescribe pursuant to § 9-27-339(a).
(B)(i) In addition, the court shall have the right as a
term of probation to require the juvenile to attend school or make
satisfactory progress toward attaining a high school equivalency diploma
approved by the Adult Education Section.
(ii) The court shall have the right to revoke
probation if the juvenile fails to regularly attend school or if satisfactory
progress toward attaining a high school equivalency diploma approved by the
Adult Education Section is not being made;
(5) Order a probation fee, not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month, as provided in § 16-13-326(a);
(6) Assess a court cost of no more than thirty-five dollars
($35.00) to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents, or his
or her guardian;
(7)(A)(5)(A) Order restitution to be paid by the juvenile, a
parent, both parents, the guardian, or his or her custodian or the parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile.
(B) If the custodian is the State of Arkansas, both
liability and the amount that may be assessed shall be determined by the
Arkansas State Claims Commission;
(8) Order a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) to
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
be paid by the juvenile, a parent, both parents, or the guardian;
(9)(6)(A) Order that the juvenile and his or her parent, both
parents, or the guardian the parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile
perform court-approved volunteer service in the community designed to
contribute to the rehabilitation of the juvenile or to the ability of the
parent, or guardian, or custodian of the juvenile to provide proper parental
care and supervision of the juvenile, not to exceed one hundred sixty (160)
hours.
(B) The juvenile or the parent, guardian, or
custodian of the juvenile shall not be required to:
(i) Participate in volunteer service in the
community for more than one hundred sixty (160) hours; or
(ii) Pay a cost for participating in the
volunteer service in the community;
(10)(A)(7)(A) Order that the parent, both parents, or the
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile attend a court-approved parental
responsibility training program if available.
(B) The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof
of completion of the court-approved parental responsibility training program
within a certain time period and payment of a fee covering the cost of the
training program.
(C) The court may provide that any violation of such
orders shall subject the parent, both parents, or the guardian, or custodian
of the juvenile to the contempt sanctions of the court.
(D) The parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile
shall not be required to pay the cost for attending the court-approved
parental responsibility training program;
(11)(A)(i)(8)(A)(i) Order that the juvenile remain in a juvenile
detention facility for an indeterminate period not to exceed ninety (90) days
at no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile.
(ii) The court may further order that the juvenile
be eligible for work release or to attend school or other educational or
vocational training at no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or
custodian of the juvenile.
(B) The juvenile detention facility shall afford
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
opportunities for education, recreation, and other rehabilitative services to
adjudicated delinquents at no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian,
or custodian of the juvenile;
(12)(9)(A) Place the juvenile on residential detention with
electronic monitoring, either in the juvenile's home or in another facility
as ordered by the court, at no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian,
or custodian of the juvenile;.
(13)(A)(B) Order the parent, both parents, or the guardian
of any A juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile
adjudicated delinquent and committed to a youth services center, detained in
a juvenile detention facility, or placed on electronic monitoring to be shall
not be liable for the cost of the commitment, detention, or electronic
monitoring.;
(B)(i) The court shall take into account the financial
ability of the parent, both parents, or the guardian to pay for the
commitment, detention, or electronic monitoring.
(ii) The court shall take into account the past
efforts of the parent, both parents, or the guardian to correct the
delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(iii) If the parent is a noncustodial parent, the
court shall take into account the opportunity the parent has had to correct
the delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(iv) The court shall take into account any other
factors the court deems relevant;
(14)(10)(A) When a juvenile is committed to a youth services
center or detained in a juvenile detention facility and the juvenile is
covered by private health insurance, order the parent, or guardian, or
custodian of the juvenile to provide information on the juvenile's health
insurance coverage, including a copy of the health insurance policy and the
pharmacy card when available, to the juvenile detention center facility or
youth services center that has physical custody of the juvenile; or.
(B) The juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of
the juvenile shall not be required to pay for the cost of medical treatment
received by the juvenile that is incurred while the juvenile is in the
physical custody of a juvenile detention facility or youth services center.
(C) The quality of medical care, including without
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
limitation specialty care, provided to the juvenile while the juvenile is in
the physical custody of a juvenile detention facility or youth services
center shall not be dependent on the juvenile's health insurance coverage; or
(15)(A)(11)(A) Order the Department of Finance and
Administration to suspend the driving privileges of any juvenile adjudicated
delinquent.
(B) The order shall be prepared and transmitted to the
Department of Finance and Administration within twenty-four (24) hours after
the juvenile has been found delinquent and is sentenced to have his or her
driving privileges suspended.
(C) The court may provide in the order for the issuance of
a restricted driving permit to allow driving to and from a place of
employment or driving to and from school or for other circumstances.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 9-27-330, concerning juvenile delinquency
dispositions and alternatives, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(k)(1) Except as provided by subdivision (k)(2) of this section, the
court shall not order a juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a
juvenile to pay costs, fees, or other expenses associated with a program or
service ordered by the court under this section.
(2) Subdivision (k)(1) of this section is subject to funding and
appropriation by the General Assembly.
(3) This subsection does not prohibit a court from ordering
restitution under subdivision (a)(5) of this section.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 9-27-331(d)(1)(A), concerning limitations
on delinquency determinations, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1)(A)(i) The court may enter an order for physical, psychiatric,
or psychological evaluation or counseling or treatment affecting the family
of a juvenile only after finding that the evaluation, counseling, or
treatment of family members is necessary for the treatment or rehabilitation
of the juvenile.
(ii)(a) Except as provided in subdivision
(d)(1)(A)(ii)(b) of this section, an order for physical, psychiatric, or
psychological evaluation or counseling or treatment of the family of a
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
juvenile under subdivision (d)(1)(A)(i) of this section shall be provided at
no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile.
(b) Subdivision (d)(1)(A)(ii)(a) of this
section is subject to funding and appropriation by the General Assembly.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 9-27-357 is amended to read as follows:
9-27-357. Deoxyribonucleic acid samples.
(a)(1) A person juvenile who is adjudicated delinquent for one (1) or
more of the following offenses shall have a deoxyribonucleic acid sample
drawn at no cost to the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile, except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section:
(1)(A) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(2)(B) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
(3)(C) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(4)(D) Incest, § 5-26-202;
(5)(E) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(6)(F) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(7)(G) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(8)(H) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(9)(I) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(10)(J) Terroristic act, § 5-13-310; and
(11)(K) Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer
or an employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section is subject to funding and
appropriation by the General Assembly.
(b) The court shall order a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250)
unless the court finds that the fine would cause an undue hardship.
(c)(1)(b)(1) Only a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for one (1) of the
offenses listed in subsection (a) of this section shall have a
deoxyribonucleic acid sample drawn upon intake at a juvenile detention
facility or intake at a Division of Youth Services facility.
(2) If the juvenile is not placed in a facility, the juvenile
probation officer to whom the juvenile is assigned shall ensure that the
deoxyribonucleic acid sample is drawn.
(d)(c) All deoxyribonucleic acid samples taken under this section
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
shall be taken in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Crime
Laboratory.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 9-27-367 is amended to read as follows:
9-27-367. Court costs, fees, and fines.
(a) The juvenile division of the circuit court may order the following
court costs, fees, and fines to be paid by adjudicated defendants to the
circuit court juvenile division fund as provided for in § 16-13-326:
(1) The court may assess an adjudicated delinquent court costs
not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) as provided under § 9-27-
330(a)(6);
(2) The court may assess an adjudicated family in need of
services court costs not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) as provided
under § 9-27-332(a)(8);
(3) The court may order a probation fee for juveniles
adjudicated delinquent not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per month as
provided under § 9-27-330(a)(5);
(4)(2) The court may order a juvenile service fee for an
adjudicated family in need of services not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month as provided under § 9-27-332(a)(9); and
(5) The court may order a fine for adjudicated delinquents of
not more than five hundred dollars ($500) as provided under § 9-27-330(a)(8);
(6)(3) The court may order a fine for an adjudicated family in
need of services of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) as provided
under § 9-27-332(a)(7); and
(7) A juvenile intake or probation officer may charge a
diversion fee limited to no more than twenty dollars ($20.00) per month as
provided under § 9-27-323.
(b)(1) The court shall direct that the juvenile division court costs
and fees be collected, maintained, and accounted for in the same manner as
juvenile probation and juvenile services fees as provided for in § 16-13-326.
(2) Except as provided in this section, in relation to a matter
involving a juvenile, the juvenile and the parent, guardian, or custodian of
the juvenile shall not be ordered to pay costs, fees, and fines or a
combination of costs, fees, and fines.

02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 9-27-602(d), concerning required
assessments for juvenile mental health services, is amended to read as
follows:
(d)(1) The court shall make a determination of the ability of the
parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile to pay in whole or in part for
mental health services A juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of
the juvenile shall not be required to pay for mental health services ordered
by the court under this section.
(2) If the court determines an ability to pay, the court shall
enter such an order for payment pursuant to § 9-27-333(e).

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 16-10-305, concerning court costs, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(i) The authority to assess court costs under this section does not
apply to:
(1) A person who is a juvenile at the time of the commission of
the delinquent act;
(2) A person who is a juvenile at the time the circuit court or
district court renders a judgment;
(3) A juvenile; or
(4) The parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile in relation
to the juvenile's delinquent act.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 16-87-201, concerning definitions
applicable to the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(5) "Juvenile" means a person who is:
(A) Under eighteen (18) years of age; and
(B) Under the jurisdiction of the criminal division of
circuit court or under the jurisdiction of the juvenile division of a circuit
court under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 16-87-213(a)(1)(A), concerning
certificates of indigency, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A)(i) Any Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii) of
this section, a person who is charged with an offense punishable by
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
imprisonment who and desires to be represented by an appointed attorney shall
file with the court in which the person is charged a written certificate of
indigency.
(ii)(a) There is a rebuttable presumption that a
juvenile is indigent for the purposes of appointing an attorney.
(b) A juvenile shall not be required to
complete a certificate of indigency.
(c)(1) Except as provided by subdivision
(a)(1)(A)(ii)(c)(2) of this section, if the court appoints an attorney to
represent the juvenile, the appointment shall be made at no cost to the
juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii)(c)(1) is
subject to funding and appropriation by the General Assembly.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 16-87-218(c)(6), concerning schedules of
costs for legal services, is amended to read as follows:
(6) Any juvenile matter with the exception of a delinquency
matter:
(A) For an early disposition, sixty-five dollars ($65.00);
(B) For a negotiated plea or disposition before trial, one
hundred twenty-five dollars ($125); or
(C) For a trial or an extended matter, five hundred
dollars ($500); or

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 16-87-218, concerning schedules of costs
for legal services, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(e)(1) A court shall not enter a judgment in favor of the state for
legal services rendered by the public defender or for costs listed in
subsection (c) of this section:
(A) In a juvenile matter;
(B) Against a defendant who was a juvenile at the time the
offense was committed;
(C) Against a juvenile; or
(D) Against the parent, guardian, or custodian of a
juvenile in a juvenile matter.
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
(2) Subdivision (e)(1) of this section is subject to funding and
appropriation by the General Assembly.

SECTION 17. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Costs — Collection
and revenue — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "juvenile" means an individual under
eighteen (18) years of age who is under the jurisdiction of a criminal
division of circuit court or under a juvenile division of a circuit court
under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
(b) On or after the effective date of this section, any judgment
against a juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile
entered on or before the effective date of this section for fines, fees,
costs, or taxes associated with a juvenile matter brought under the Arkansas
Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., is void and uncollectible to the
extent that a balance remains due, including without limitation any post-
judgment interest, penalties, or collection expenses associated with the
fines, fees, costs, or taxes.
(c)(1) Any civil judgment, lien, or other legal encumbrance against a
juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile entered on or
before the effective date of this section in connection with fines, fees,
costs, or taxes associated with a juvenile matter is vacated.
(2) The court administrator shall not charge any fees associated
with the satisfaction of a civil judgment, lien, or other legal encumbrance
vacated under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.
(d)(1) On or before January 1, 2024, the Administrative Office of the
Courts, in consultation with state and municipal agencies, shall establish
procedures to vacate and discharge the following for juveniles and the
parents, guardians, or custodians of juveniles:
(A) All unpaid outstanding balances for fines, fees,
costs, or taxes; and
(B) All unsatisfied civil judgments, liens, and legal
encumbrances entered in connection with fines, fees, costs, or taxes
associated with a juvenile matter.
(2) The procedures under subdivision (d)(1) of this section
shall not require a juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of a
juvenile to act affirmatively to initiate the procedures to vacate and
02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139

SB340
discharge outstanding:
(A) Balances for fines, fees, costs, and taxes; and
(B) Unsatisfied civil judgments, liens, and legal
encumbrances.
(e) Any savings in costs associated with the collection of fines,
fees, costs, and taxes or civil judgments, liens, and legal encumbrances as a
result of this section shall be directed to community initiatives in
accordance with the reinvestment plan developed by the Division of Youth
Services under § 9-28-1203.



























02/27/2025 8:06:06 AM LJH139